Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma Dream


Accounts Investment Program Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9011.1 of Title 62, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 3132 Page 1


A. As used in this section:


1. “Trump Account” means a federally authorized Trump Account


established pursuant to 26 U.S.C., Section 530A;


2. “Eligible child” means a person who:


a. is under eighteen (18) years of age at the time the


application for a Trump Account is submitted,


b. is a citizen of the United States and is assigned a


valid Social Security number,


c. has a primary residence within this state, and


d. has an established Trump Account; and


3. “Program” means the Oklahoma Dream Account Investment


Program.


B. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Dream Account


Investment Program, to be administered by the State Treasurer.


C. The program shall authorize a one-time contribution by this


state into a Trump Account established for an eligible child,


subject to the availability of funds.


D. The State Treasurer is authorized to contribute to Trump


Accounts upon verification that the Trump Account is established for


an eligible child and that the contribution does not cause the


balance of the fund to exceed any applicable federal contribution


limitations. Upon verification, the State Treasurer shall make a


one-time deposit of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00), as funds


become available in the Oklahoma Trump Account Investment Fund,

Req. No. 3132 Page 2


created pursuant to Section 3 of this act. The State Treasurer


shall make contributions, in the order that verified applications


are submitted.


E. Applications for the contribution shall be made on a form


prescribed by the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer may


promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this section.


F. Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize a


contribution that is prohibited by federal laws or regulations.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9011.2 of Title 62, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the State Treasurer to be designated the “Oklahoma Trump Account


Investment Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject


to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received


by the State Treasurer that are designated for deposit in the fund.


All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby


appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State Treasurer


for the purpose provided for in Section 2 of this act. Expenditures


from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State


Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for


approval and payment.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

Req. No. 3132 Page 3


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3132 QD 1/15/2026 1:42:31 PM





































Req. No. 3132 Page 4